Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 12 Wyoming School for the Deaf

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15 Am. Jur. 2d Charities §§ 171 to 207.

§ 25-12-101.
Wyoming school for the deaf; establishment; purpose; supervision.

The Wyoming school for the deaf is established at Casper, Wyoming, to provide to every child of school age in the state of Wyoming who is hearing impaired and for whom no lesser restrictive placement can be provided by the local school district a free and appropriate education in accordance with the child’s capabilities.

The Wyoming school for the deaf shall be operated and maintained under the general supervision of the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to W.S.

21-2-202

. The superintendent shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the program and shall facilitate continued cooperation with Natrona county school district number 1. The school shall be staffed as follows:

Except for substitute teachers who shall hold a substitute teaching permit, teachers at the school shall hold a Wyoming standard teaching certificate, including an endorsement for deaf education;

The administrator at the school shall hold a Wyoming standard teaching certificate, including endorsements for deaf education and school principal;

Interpreters at the school shall be qualified under rules promulgated by the department of education;

Ancillary staff shall be qualified for the positions they hold.

The program may serve as a repository for equipment and materials to assist local agencies serving individuals with hearing impairments.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 185, § 1.